test/src/morphology/N-loul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - loul: # Noun 98 'eng /est loul/fin' - full paradigm
     loul+N+Sg+Nom: loul
     loul+N+Sg+Gen: loul
     loul+N+Sg+Par: loulõ
     loul+N+Sg+Dat: loulõn
     loul+N+Sg+Ins: loulõks
     loul+N+Sg+Ill: loulõ
     loul+N+Sg+Ela: loulstõ
     loul+N+Pl+Nom: lōlõd
     loul+N+Pl+Gen: lōlõd
     loul+N+Pl+Par: lōlidi
     loul+N+Pl+Dat: lōlõdõn
     loul+N+Pl+Ins: lōlõdõks
     loul+N+Pl+Ill: lōliž
     loul+N+Pl+Ela: lōlist
